apertium-lit.lit.dix
    <pardef n="al/us__n_m">
      <e><p><l>aus</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ui</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ų</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uje</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>au</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>umi</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>us</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="gaid/ys__n_m">
      <e><p><l>žio</l><r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žiui</l><r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>į</l><r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yje</l><r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>y</l><r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žiu</l><r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ys</l><r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ži</l><r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žiams</l><r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žius</l><r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žiuose</l><r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žiai</l><r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žiais</l><r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žiai</l><r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="t/vas__n_m">
      <e><p><l>vo</l><r>vas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vui</l><r>vas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vą</l><r>vas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ėve</l><r>vas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ve</l><r>vas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vu</l><r>vas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vas</l><r>vas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ėv</l><r>vas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ėvams</l><r>vas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vus</l><r>vas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ėvuose</l><r>vas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ėvai</l><r>vas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ėvais</l><r>vas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ėvai</l><r>vas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="s/ūnu__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ūnaus</l><r>ūnu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nui</l><r>ūnu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nų</l><r>ūnu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ūnuje</l><r>ūnu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ūnau</l><r>ūnu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ūnumi</l><r>ūnu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ūnus</l><r>ūnu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ūn</l><r>ūnu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ūnums</l><r>ūnu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nus</l><r>ūnu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ūnuose</l><r>ūnu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nūs</l><r>ūnu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ūnumis</l><r>ūnu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nūs</l><r>ūnu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="keli/as__n_m">
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ui</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ą</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uje</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>au</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ams</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>us</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uose</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ai</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ais</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ai</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="amži/us__n_m">
      <e><p><l>aus</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ui</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ų</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uje</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>au</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>umi</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>us</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ų</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ams</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>us</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uose</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ai</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ais</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ai</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="or/as__n_m">
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ui</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ą</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ų</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ams</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>us</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uose</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ai</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ais</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ai</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     

    <e lm="operatorius"><i>operatori</i><par n="amži/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="garsas"><i>gars</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="komitetas"><i>komitet</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="matavimas"><i>matavim</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="klientas"><i>klient</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="algoritmas"><i>algoritm</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="aidas"><i>aid</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="mitas"><i>mit</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="fenomenas"><i>fenomen</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tramvajus"><i>tramvaj</i><par n="amži/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="programavimas"><i>programavim</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="iniciatorius"><i>iniciatori</i><par n="amži/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ženklas"><i>ženkl</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kaimas"><i>kaim</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sektorius"><i>sektori</i><par n="amži/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="gyvenimas"><i>gyvenim</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ragas"><i>rag</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="perteklius"><i>pertekli</i><par n="amži/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="šalmas"><i>šalm</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="projektas"><i>projekt</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="vyras"><i>vyr</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sekretorius"><i>sekretori</i><par n="amži/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="vardas"><i>vard</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="meistras"><i>meistr</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="koeficientas"><i>koeficient</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="geras"><i>ger</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="vektorius"><i>vektori</i><par n="amži/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="prancūzas"><i>prancūz</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kraujas"><i>krauj</i><par n="keli/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tvas"><i>t</i><par n="t/vas__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="balsas"><i>bals</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="turtas"><i>turt</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="šventorius"><i>šventori</i><par n="amži/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="skaičius"><i>skaiči</i><par n="amži/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="balansas"><i>balans</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="nacionalizmas"><i>nacionalizm</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="administratorius"><i>administratori</i><par n="amži/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="skulptorius"><i>skulptori</i><par n="amži/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="delfinas"><i>delfin</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="terminas"><i>termin</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="gyvūnas"><i>gyvūn</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="klimatas"><i>klimat</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="vadas"><i>vad</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="metodas"><i>metod</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kryžius"><i>kryži</i><par n="amži/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="gaidys"><i>gaid</i><par n="gaid/ys__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="augimas"><i>augim</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="produktas"><i>produkt</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="karalius"><i>karali</i><par n="amži/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="jaunimas"><i>jaunim</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="popiežius"><i>popieži</i><par n="amži/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="alus"><i>al</i><par n="al/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="skyrius"><i>skyri</i><par n="amži/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="spaudimas"><i>spaudim</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="procesorius"><i>procesori</i><par n="amži/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="amžius"><i>amži</i><par n="amži/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="medus"><i>med</i><par n="al/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="misionierius"><i>misionieri</i><par n="amži/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="rajonas"><i>rajon</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="karas"><i>kar</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sūnus"><i>s</i><par n="s/ūnu__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="popierius"><i>popieri</i><par n="amži/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="žirgas"><i>žirg</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="altorius"><i>altori</i><par n="amži/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="vabalas"><i>vabal</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kelias"><i>keli</i><par n="keli/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="stabilumas"><i>stabilum</i><par n="or/as__n_m"/></e>
